Washington statutes.
RCW 36.65.010

Intent.

It is the intent of the legislature in enacting this chapter to provide for the implementation and clarification of Article XI, section 16 of the state Constitution, which authorizes the formation of combined city and county municipal corporations.

"City-county," as used in this chapter, means a combined city and county municipal corporation under Article XI, section 16 of the state Constitution.

[ 1984 c 91 s 1.]